Florida, session 2026, SB32.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 41 42 Section 1.âSection 784.046, Florida Statutes, is amended to 43 read: 44 784.046âAction by victim of repeat or serious violence, 45 sexual violence, or dating violence for protective injunction; 46 dating violence investigations, notice to victims, and 47 reporting; pretrial release violations; public records 48 exemption.â 49 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 50 (a)ââViolenceâ means any assault, aggravated assault, 51 battery, aggravated battery, sexual assault, sexual battery, 52 stalking, aggravated stalking, kidnapping, or false 53 imprisonment, or any criminal offense resulting in physical 54 injury or death, by a person against any other person. 55 (b)ââRepeat or serious violenceâ means: 56 1.âTwo incidents of violence or stalking committed by the 57 respondent, one of which must have been within 6 months of the 58 filing of the petition, which are directed against the 59 petitioner or the petitionerâs immediate family member; 60 2.âOne act committed by the respondent which causes bodily 61 injury to the petitioner; or 62 3.âA death threat made by the respondent against the 63 petitioner. 64 (c)ââSexual violenceâ means any one incident of: 65 1.âSexual battery, as defined in chapter 794; 66 2.âA lewd or lascivious act, as defined in chapter 800, 67 committed upon or in the presence of a person younger than 16 68 years of age; 69 3.âLuring or enticing a child, as described in chapter 787; 70 4.âSexual performance by a child, as described in chapter 71 827; or 72 5.âAny other forcible felony wherein a sexual act is 73 committed or attempted, 74 75 regardless of whether criminal charges based on the incident 76 were filed, reduced, or dismissed by the state attorney. 77 (d)ââDating violenceâ means violence between individuals 78 who have or have had a continuing and significant relationship 79 of a romantic or intimate nature. The existence of such a 80 relationship must shall be determined based on the consideration 81 of the following factors: 82 1.âA dating relationship must have existed within the past 83 6 months; 84 2.âThe nature of the relationship must have been 85 characterized by the expectation of affection or sexual 86 involvement between the parties; and 87 3.âThe frequency and type of interaction between the 88 persons involved in the relationship must have included that the 89 persons have been involved over time and on a continuous basis 90 during the course of the relationship. 91 92 The term does not include violence in a casual acquaintanceship 93 or violence between individuals who only have engaged in 94 ordinary fraternization in a business or social context. 95 (2)âThere is created a cause of action for an injunction 96 for protection in cases of repeat or serious violence, there is 97 created a separate cause of action for an injunction for 98 protection in cases of dating violence, and there is created a 99 separate cause of action for an injunction for protection in 100 cases of sexual violence. 101 (a)âAny person who is the victim of repeat or serious 102 violence or the parent or legal guardian of any minor child who 103 is living at home and who seeks an injunction for protection 104 against repeat or serious violence on behalf of the minor child 105 has standing in the circuit court to file a verified petition 106 for an injunction for protection against repeat or serious 107 violence. 108 (b)âAny person who is the victim of dating violence and has 109 reasonable cause to believe he or she is in imminent danger of 110 becoming the victim of another act of dating violence, or any 111 person who has reasonable cause to believe he or she is in 112 imminent danger of becoming the victim of an act of dating 113 violence, or the parent or legal guardian of any minor child who 114 is living at home and who seeks an injunction for protection 115 against dating violence on behalf of that minor child, has 116 standing in the circuit court to file a verified petition for an 117 injunction for protection against dating violence. 118 (c)âA person who is the victim of sexual violence or the 119 parent or legal guardian of a minor child who is living at home 120 who is the victim of sexual violence has standing in the circuit 121 court to file a verified petition for an injunction for 122 protection against sexual violence on his or her own behalf or 123 on behalf of the minor child if: 124 1.âThe person has reported the sexual violence to a law 125 enforcement agency and is cooperating in any criminal proceeding 126 against the respondent, regardless of whether criminal charges 127 based on the sexual violence have been filed, reduced, or 128 dismissed by the state attorney; or 129 2.âThe respondent who committed the sexual violence against 130 the victim or minor child was sentenced to a term of 131 imprisonment in state prison for the sexual violence and the 132 respondentâs term of imprisonment has expired or is due to 133 expire within 90 days following the date the petition is filed. 134 (d)âA cause of action for an injunction may be sought 135 whether or not any other petition, complaint, or cause of action 136 is currently available or pending between the parties. 137 (e)âA cause of action for an injunction does not require 138 that the petitioner be represented by an attorney. 139 (3)(a)âThe clerk of the court shall provide a copy of this 140 section, simplified forms, and clerical assistance for the 141 preparation and filing of such a petition by any person who is 142 not represented by counsel. 143 (b)âNotwithstanding any other law, the clerk of the court 144 may not assess a fee for filing a petition for protection 145 against repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, or dating 146 violence. However, subject to legislative appropriation, the 147 clerk of the court may, each quarter, submit to the Justice 148 Administrative Commission a certified request for reimbursement 149 for petitions for protection issued by the court under this 150 section at the rate of $40 per petition. The request for 151 reimbursement must be submitted in the form and manner 152 prescribed by the Justice Administrative Commission. From this 153 reimbursement, the clerk shall pay the law enforcement agency 154 serving the injunction the fee requested by the law enforcement 155 agency; however, this fee may not exceed $20. 156 (c)âNo bond is shall be required by the court for the entry 157 of an injunction. 158 (d)âThe clerk of the court shall provide the petitioner 159 with a certified copy of any injunction for protection against 160 repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, or dating violence 161 entered by the court. 162 (4)(a)âThe verified petition must shall allege the 163 incidents of repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, or 164 dating violence and must shall include the specific facts and 165 circumstances that form the basis upon which relief is sought. 166 With respect to a minor child who is living at home, the parent 167 or legal guardian seeking the protective injunction on behalf of 168 the minor child must: 169 1.âHave been an eyewitness to, or have direct physical 170 evidence or affidavits from eyewitnesses of, the specific facts 171 and circumstances that form the basis upon which relief is 172 sought, if the party against whom the protective injunction is 173 sought is also a parent, stepparent, or legal guardian of the 174 minor child; or 175 2.âHave reasonable cause to believe that the minor child is 176 a victim of repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, or 177 dating violence to form the basis upon which relief is sought, 178 if the party against whom the protective injunction is sought is 179 a person other than a parent, stepparent, or legal guardian of 180 the minor child. 181 (b)âThe verified petition must be in substantially the 182 following form: 183 184 PETITION FOR INJUNCTION FOR PROTECTION 185 AGAINST REPEAT OR SERIOUS VIOLENCE, SEXUAL 186 VIOLENCE, OR DATING VIOLENCE 187 188 The undersigned petitioner ...(name)... declares under 189 penalties of perjury that the following statements are true: 190 191 1.âPetitioner resides at ...(address)... (A petitioner for 192 an injunction for protection against sexual violence may furnish 193 an address to the court in a separate confidential filing if, 194 for safety reasons, the petitioner requires the location of his 195 or her current residence to be confidential pursuant to s. 196 119.071(2)(j), Florida Statutes.) 197 2.âRespondent resides at ...(address).... 198 3.a.âPetitioner has suffered repeat or serious violence as 199 demonstrated by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate 200 incidents of violence)... 201 202 203 204 205 206 b.âPetitioner has suffered sexual violence as demonstrated 207 by the fact that the respondent has: ...(enumerate incident of 208 violence and include incident report number from law enforcement 209 agency or attach notice of inmate release)... 210 211 212 213 214 215 c.âPetitioner is a victim of dating violence and has 216 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger 217 of becoming the victim of another act of dating violence or has 218 reasonable cause to believe that he or she is in imminent danger 219 of becoming a victim of dating violence, as demonstrated by the 220 fact that the respondent has: ...(list the specific incident or 221 incidents of violence and describe the length of time of the 222 relationship, whether it has been in existence during the last 6 223 months, the nature of the relationship of a romantic or intimate 224 nature, the frequency and type of interaction, and any other 225 facts that characterize the relationship)... 226 227 228 229 230 231 4.âPetitioner genuinely fears repeat or serious violence by 232 the respondent. 233 5.âPetitioner seeks: an immediate injunction against the 234 respondent, enjoining him or her from committing any further 235 acts of violence; an injunction enjoining the respondent from 236 committing any further acts of violence; and an injunction 237 providing any terms the court deems necessary for the protection 238 of the petitioner and the petitionerâs immediate family, 239 including any injunctions or directives to law enforcement 240 agencies. 241 242 (c)âEvery petition for an injunction against sexual 243 violence, dating violence, or repeat or serious violence must 244 contain, directly above the signature line, a statement in all 245 capital letters and bold type not smaller than the surrounding 246 text, as follows: 247 248 UNDER PENALTIES OF PERJURY, I DECLARE THAT I HAVE READ 249 THE FOREGOING DOCUMENT AND THAT THE FACTS STATED IN IT 250 ARE TRUE. I UNDERSTAND THAT THE STATEMENTS MADE IN 251 THIS PETITION ARE BEING MADE UNDER PENALTIES OF 252 PERJURY, PUNISHABLE AS PROVIDED IN SECTION 92.525, 253 FLORIDA STATUTES. 254 255 ...(initials)... 256 257 (5)âUpon the filing of the petition, the court shall set a 258 hearing to be held at the earliest possible time. The respondent 259 must shall be personally served with a copy of the petition, 260 notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, before 261 prior to the hearing. 262 (6)(a)âWhen it appears to the court that an immediate and 263 present danger of violence exists, the court may grant a 264 temporary injunction that which may be granted in an ex parte 265 hearing, pending a full hearing, and may grant such relief as 266 the court deems proper, including an injunction enjoining the 267 respondent from committing any acts of violence. 268 (b)âExcept as provided in s. 90.204, in a hearing ex parte 269 for the purpose of obtaining such temporary injunction, no 270 evidence other than the verified pleading or affidavit may shall 271 be used as evidence, unless the respondent appears at the 272 hearing or has received reasonable notice of the hearing. 273 (c)âAny such ex parte temporary injunction is shall be 274 effective for a fixed period not to exceed 15 days. However, an 275 ex parte temporary injunction granted under subparagraph 276 (2)(c)2. is effective for 15 days following the date the 277 respondent is released from incarceration. A full hearing, as 278 provided by this section, must shall be set for a date no later 279 than the date when the temporary injunction ceases to be 280 effective. The court may grant a continuance of the ex parte 281 injunction and the full hearing before or during a hearing, for 282 good cause shown by any party. 283 (7)âUpon notice and hearing, the court may grant such 284 relief as the court deems proper, including an injunction: 285 (a)âEnjoining the respondent from committing any acts of 286 violence. 287 (b)âOrdering such other relief as the court deems necessary 288 for the protection of the petitioner, including injunctions or 289 directives to law enforcement agencies, as provided in this 290 section. 291 (c)âThe terms of the injunction shall remain in full force 292 and effect until modified or dissolved. Either party may move at 293 any time to modify or dissolve the injunction. Such relief may 294 be granted in addition to other civil or criminal remedies. 295 (d)âA temporary or final judgment on injunction for 296 protection against repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, 297 or dating violence entered pursuant to this section must shall, 298 on its face, indicate that: 299 1.âThe injunction is valid and enforceable in all counties 300 of the State of Florida. 301 2.âLaw enforcement officers may use their arrest powers 302 pursuant to s. 901.15(6) to enforce the terms of the injunction. 303 3.âThe court had jurisdiction over the parties and matter 304 under the laws of Florida and that reasonable notice and 305 opportunity to be heard was given to the person against whom the 306 order is sought sufficient to protect that personâs right to due 307 process. 308 4.âThe date that the respondent was served with the 309 temporary or final order, if obtainable. 310 (8)(a)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues an 311 injunction for protection against repeat or serious violence, 312 sexual violence, or dating violence, the clerk of the court 313 shall electronically transmit a copy of the petition, notice of 314 hearing, and temporary injunction, if any, to the sheriff or a 315 law enforcement agency of the county where the respondent 316 resides or can be found, who shall serve it upon the respondent 317 as soon thereafter as possible on any day of the week and at any 318 time of the day or night. An electronic copy of an injunction 319 must be certified by the clerk of the court, and the electronic 320 copy must be served in the same manner as a certified copy. Upon 321 receiving an electronic copy of the injunction, the sheriff must 322 verify receipt with the sender before attempting to serve it 323 upon the respondent. In addition, if the sheriff is in 324 possession of an injunction for protection that has been 325 certified by the clerk of the court, the sheriff may 326 electronically transmit a copy of that injunction to a law 327 enforcement officer who shall serve it in the same manner as a 328 certified copy. The clerk of the court is responsible for 329 furnishing to the sheriff such information on the respondentâs 330 physical description and location as is required by the 331 department to comply with the verification procedures set forth 332 in this section. Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, 333 the chief judge of each circuit, in consultation with the 334 appropriate sheriff, may authorize a law enforcement agency 335 within the chief judgeâs jurisdiction to effect this type of 336 service and to receive a portion of the service fee. A person 337 may not serve or execute an injunction issued under this section 338 unless the person is a law enforcement officer as defined in 339 chapter 943. 340 2.âWhen an injunction is issued, if the petitioner requests 341 the assistance of a law enforcement agency, the court may order 342 that an officer from the appropriate law enforcement agency 343 accompany the petitioner and assist in the execution or service 344 of the injunction. A law enforcement officer must accept a copy 345 of an injunction for protection against repeat or serious 346 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence, certified by the 347 clerk of the court, from the petitioner and immediately serve it 348 upon a respondent who has been located but not yet served. 349 (b)âA Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat or Serious 350 Violence Injunction Statewide Verification System is created 351 within the Department of Law Enforcement. The department shall 352 establish, implement, and maintain a statewide communication 353 system capable of electronically transmitting information to and 354 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 355 injunctions, dating violence injunctions, sexual violence 356 injunctions, and repeat or serious violence injunctions issued 357 by the courts throughout the state. Such information must 358 include, but is not limited to, information as to the existence 359 and status of any injunction for verification purposes. 360 (c)1.âWithin 24 hours after the court issues an injunction 361 for protection against repeat or serious violence, sexual 362 violence, or dating violence or changes or vacates an injunction 363 for protection against repeat or serious violence, sexual 364 violence, or dating violence, the clerk of the court must 365 electronically transmit a copy of the injunction to the sheriff 366 with jurisdiction over the residence of the petitioner. 367 2.âWithin 24 hours after service of process of an 368 injunction for protection against repeat or serious violence, 369 sexual violence, or dating violence upon a respondent, the law 370 enforcement officer must electronically transmit the written 371 proof of service of process to the sheriff with jurisdiction 372 over the residence of the petitioner. 373 3.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff receives a certified 374 copy of the injunction for protection against repeat or serious 375 violence, sexual violence, or dating violence, the sheriff must 376 make information relating to the injunction available to other 377 law enforcement agencies by electronically transmitting such 378 information to the department. 379 4.âWithin 24 hours after the sheriff or other law 380 enforcement officer has made service upon the respondent and the 381 sheriff has been so notified, the sheriff must make information 382 relating to the service available to other law enforcement 383 agencies by electronically transmitting such information to the 384 department. 385 5.âSubject to available funding, the Florida Association of 386 Court Clerks and Comptrollers shall develop an automated process 387 by which a petitioner may request notification of service of the 388 injunction for protection against repeat or serious violence, 389 sexual violence, or dating violence and other court actions 390 related to the injunction for protection. The automated notice 391 must be made within 12 hours after the sheriff or other law 392 enforcement officer serves the injunction upon the respondent. 393 The notification must include, at a minimum, the date, time, and 394 location where the injunction for protection against repeat or 395 serious violence, sexual violence, or dating violence was 396 served. The Florida Association of Court Clerks and Comptrollers 397 may apply for any available grants to fund the development of 398 the automated process. 399 6.âWithin 24 hours after an injunction for protection 400 against repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, or dating 401 violence is lifted, terminated, or otherwise rendered no longer 402 effective by ruling of the court, the clerk of the court must 403 notify the sheriff or local law enforcement agency receiving 404 original notification of the injunction as provided in 405 subparagraph 2. That agency shall, within 24 hours after 406 receiving such notification from the clerk of the court, notify 407 the department of such action of the court. 408 (d)âThe petitioner may request a Hope Card under s. 741.311 409 after the court has issued a final order of protection. 410 (9)(a)âThe court shall enforce, through a civil or criminal 411 contempt proceeding, a violation of an injunction for 412 protection. The court may enforce the respondentâs compliance 413 with the injunction by imposing a monetary assessment. The clerk 414 of the court shall collect and receive such assessments. On a 415 monthly basis, the clerk shall transfer the moneys collected 416 pursuant to this paragraph to the State Treasury for deposit in 417 the Crimes Compensation Trust Fund established in s. 960.21. 418 (b)âIf the respondent is arrested by a law enforcement 419 officer under s. 901.15(6) for committing an act of repeat or 420 serious violence, sexual violence, or dating violence in 421 violation of an injunction for protection, the respondent must 422 shall be held in custody until brought before the court as 423 expeditiously as possible for the purpose of enforcing the 424 injunction and for admittance to bail in accordance with chapter 425 903 and the applicable rules of criminal procedure, pending a 426 hearing. 427 (10)âThe petitioner or the respondent may move the court to 428 modify or dissolve an injunction at any time. 429 (11)âAny law enforcement officer who investigates an 430 alleged incident of dating violence shall assist the victim to 431 obtain medical treatment if such is required as a result of the 432 alleged incident to which the officer responds. Any law 433 enforcement officer who investigates an alleged incident of 434 dating violence shall advise the victim of such violence that 435 there is a domestic violence center from which the victim may 436 receive services. The law enforcement officer shall give the 437 victim immediate notice of the legal rights and remedies 438 available on a standard form developed and distributed by the 439 Department of Law Enforcement. As necessary, the Department of 440 Law Enforcement shall revise the Legal Rights and Remedies 441 Notice to Victims to include a general summary of this section, 442 using simple English as well as Spanish, and shall distribute 443 the notice as a model form to be used by all law enforcement 444 agencies throughout this the state. The notice must shall 445 include: 446 (a)âThe resource listing, including telephone number, for 447 the area domestic violence center designated by the Department 448 of Children and Families; and 449 (b)âA copy of the following statement: 450 451 âIF YOU ARE THE VICTIM OF DATING VIOLENCE, you may ask 452 the state attorney to file a criminal complaint. You 453 also have the right to go to court and file a petition 454 requesting an injunction for protection from dating 455 violence which may include, but need not be limited 456 to, provisions that restrain the abuser from further 457 acts of abuse; direct the abuser to leave your 458 household; and prevent the abuser from entering your 459 residence, school, business, or place of employment.â 460 461 (12)âWhen a law enforcement officer investigates an 462 allegation that an incident of dating violence has occurred, the 463 officer shall handle the incident pursuant to the arrest policy 464 provided in s. 901.15(7), and as developed in accordance with 465 subsections (13), (14), and (16). Whether or not an arrest is 466 made, the officer shall make a written police report that is 467 complete and clearly indicates that the alleged offense was an 468 incident of dating violence. Such report must shall be given to 469 the officerâs supervisor and filed with the law enforcement 470 agency in a manner that will permit data on dating violence 471 cases to be compiled. Such report must include: 472 (a)âA description of physical injuries observed, if any. 473 (b)âIf a law enforcement officer decides not to make an 474 arrest or decides to arrest two or more parties, the grounds for 475 not arresting anyone or for arresting two or more parties. 476 (c)âA statement indicating which indicates that a copy of 477 the legal rights and remedies notice was given to the victim. 478 479 Whenever possible, the law enforcement officer shall obtain a 480 written statement from the victim and witnesses concerning the 481 alleged dating violence. The officer shall submit the report to 482 the supervisor or other person to whom the employerâs rules or 483 policies require reports of similar allegations of criminal 484 activity to be made. The law enforcement agency shall, without 485 charge, send a copy of the initial police report, as well as any 486 subsequent, supplemental, or related report, which excludes 487 victim or witness statements or other materials that are part of 488 an active criminal investigation and are exempt from disclosure 489 under chapter 119, to the nearest locally certified domestic 490 violence center within 24 hours after the agencyâs receipt of 491 the report. The report furnished to the domestic violence center 492 must include a narrative description of the dating violence 493 incident. 494 (13)âWhenever a law enforcement officer determines upon 495 probable cause that an act of dating violence has been committed 496 within the jurisdiction, or that a person has violated a 497 condition of pretrial release as provided in s. 903.047 and the 498 original arrest was for an act of dating violence, the officer 499 may arrest the person or persons suspected of its commission and 500 charge such person or persons with the appropriate crime. The 501 decision to arrest and charge does shall not require consent of 502 the victim or consideration of the relationship of the parties. 503 (14)(a)âWhen complaints are received from two or more 504 parties, the officers shall evaluate each complaint separately 505 to determine whether there is probable cause for arrest. 506 (b)âIf a law enforcement officer has probable cause to 507 believe that two or more persons have committed a misdemeanor or 508 felony, or if two or more persons make complaints to the 509 officer, the officer must shall try to determine who was the 510 primary aggressor. Arrest is the preferred response only with 511 respect to the primary aggressor and not the preferred response 512 with respect to a person who acts in a reasonable manner to 513 protect or defend himself or herself or another family or 514 household member from dating violence. 515 (15)âA person who willfully violates a condition of 516 pretrial release provided in s. 903.047, when the original 517 arrest was for an act of dating violence as defined in this 518 section, commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable 519 as provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, and shall be held in 520 custody until his or her first appearance. 521 (16)âA law enforcement officer acting in good faith under 522 this section and the officerâs employing agency shall be immune 523 from all liability, civil or criminal, that might otherwise be 524 incurred or imposed by reason of the officerâs or agencyâs 525 actions in carrying out the provisions of this section. 526 Section 2.âParagraph (a) of subsection (5) of section 527 44.407, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 528 44.407âElder-focused dispute resolution process.â 529 (5)âQUALIFICATIONS FOR ELDERCARING COORDINATORS.â 530 (a)âThe court shall appoint qualified eldercaring 531 coordinators who: 532 1.âMeet one of the following professional requirements: 533 a.âAre licensed as a mental health professional under 534 chapter 491 and hold at least a masterâs degree in the 535 professional field of practice; 536 b.âAre licensed as a psychologist under chapter 490; 537 c.âAre licensed as a physician under chapter 458 or chapter 538 459; 539 d.âAre licensed as a nurse under chapter 464 and hold at 540 least a masterâs degree; 541 e.âAre certified by the Florida Supreme Court as a family 542 mediator and hold at least a masterâs degree; 543 f.âAre a member in good standing of The Florida Bar; or 544 g.âAre a professional guardian as defined in s. 744.102(17) 545 and hold at least a masterâs degree. 546 2.âHave completed all of the following: 547 a.âThree years of postlicensure or postcertification 548 practice; 549 b.âA family mediation training program certified by the 550 Florida Supreme Court; and 551 c.âAn eldercaring coordinator training program certified by 552 the Florida Supreme Court. The training must total at least 44 553 hours and must include advanced tactics for dispute resolution 554 of issues related to aging, illness, incapacity, or other 555 vulnerabilities associated with elders, as well as elder, 556 guardianship, and incapacity law and procedures and less 557 restrictive alternatives to guardianship; phases of eldercaring 558 coordination and the role and functions of an eldercaring 559 coordinator; the elderâs role within eldercaring coordination; 560 family dynamics related to eldercaring coordination; eldercaring 561 coordination skills and techniques; multicultural competence and 562 its use in eldercaring coordination; at least 6 hours of the 563 implications of elder abuse, neglect, and exploitation and other 564 safety issues pertinent to the training; at least 4 hours of 565 ethical considerations pertaining to the training; use of 566 technology within eldercaring coordination; and court-specific 567 eldercaring coordination procedures. Pending certification of a 568 training program by the Florida Supreme Court, the eldercaring 569 coordinator must document completion of training that satisfies 570 the hours and the elements prescribed in this sub-subparagraph. 571 3.âHave successfully passed a Level 2 background screening 572 as provided in s. 435.04(2) and (3) or are exempt from 573 disqualification under s. 435.07. The prospective eldercaring 574 coordinator must submit a full set of fingerprints to the court 575 or to a vendor, entity, or agency authorized by s. 943.053(13). 576 The court, vendor, entity, or agency shall forward the 577 fingerprints to the Department of Law Enforcement for state 578 processing, and the Department of Law Enforcement shall forward 579 the fingerprints to the Federal Bureau of Investigation for 580 national processing. The prospective eldercaring coordinator 581 shall pay the fees for state and federal fingerprint processing. 582 The state cost for fingerprint processing shall be as provided 583 in s. 943.053(3)(e) for records provided to persons or entities 584 other than those specified as exceptions therein. 585 4.âHave not been a respondent in a final order granting an 586 injunction for protection against domestic, dating, sexual, or 587 repeat or serious violence or stalking or exploitation of an 588 elder or a disabled person. 589 5.âHave met any additional qualifications the court may 590 require to address issues specific to the parties. 591 Section 3.âParagraph (a) of subsection (3) of section 592 61.1825, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 593 61.1825âState Case Registry.â 594 (3)(a)âFor the purpose of this section, a family violence 595 indicator must be placed on a record when: 596 1.âA party executes a sworn statement requesting that a 597 family violence indicator be placed on that partyâs record which 598 states that the party has reason to believe that release of 599 information to the Federal Case Registry may result in physical 600 or emotional harm to the party or the child; or 601 2.âA temporary or final injunction for protection against 602 domestic violence has been granted pursuant to s. 741.30(6), an 603 injunction for protection against domestic violence has been 604 issued by a court of a foreign state pursuant to s. 741.315, or 605 a temporary or final injunction for protection against repeat or 606 serious violence has been granted pursuant to s. 784.046; or 607 3.âThe department has received information on a Title IV-D 608 case from the Domestic, Dating, Sexual, and Repeat or Serious 609 Violence Injunction Statewide Verification System, established 610 pursuant to s. 784.046(8)(b), that a court has granted a party a 611 domestic violence or repeat or serious violence injunction. 612 Section 4.âParagraph (k) of subsection (1) of section 613 119.0714, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 614 119.0714âCourt files; court records; official records.â 615 (1)âCOURT FILES.âNothing in this chapter shall be construed 616 to exempt from s. 119.07(1) a public record that was made a part 617 of a court file and that is not specifically closed by order of 618 court, except: 619 (k)1.âA petition, and the contents thereof, for an 620 injunction for protection against domestic violence, repeat or 621 serious violence, dating violence, sexual violence, stalking, or 622 cyberstalking that is dismissed without a hearing, dismissed at 623 an ex parte hearing due to failure to state a claim or lack of 624 jurisdiction, or dismissed for any reason having to do with the 625 sufficiency of the petition itself without an injunction being 626 issued on or after July 1, 2017, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and 627 s. 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution. 628 2.âA petition, and the contents thereof, for an injunction 629 for protection against domestic violence, repeat or serious 630 violence, dating violence, sexual violence, stalking, or 631 cyberstalking that is dismissed without a hearing, dismissed at 632 an ex parte hearing due to failure to state a claim or lack of 633 jurisdiction, or dismissed for any reason having to do with the 634 sufficiency of the petition itself without an injunction being 635 issued before July 1, 2017, is exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 636 24(a), Art. I of the State Constitution only upon request by an 637 individual named in the petition as a respondent. The request 638 must be in the form of a signed, legibly written request 639 specifying the case name, case number, document heading, and 640 page number. The request must be delivered by mail, facsimile, 641 or electronic transmission or in person to the clerk of the 642 court. A fee may not be charged for such request. 643 3.âAny information that can be used to identify a 644 petitioner or respondent in a petition for an injunction against 645 domestic violence, repeat or serious violence, dating violence, 646 sexual violence, stalking, or cyberstalking, and any affidavits, 647 notice of hearing, and temporary injunction, is confidential and 648 exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I of the State 649 Constitution until the respondent has been personally served 650 with a copy of the petition for injunction, affidavits, notice 651 of hearing, and temporary injunction. 652 Section 5.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 653 394.4597, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 654 394.4597âPersons to be notified; patientâs representative.â 655 (2)âINVOLUNTARY PATIENTS.â 656 (e)âThe following persons are prohibited from selection as 657 a patientâs representative: 658 1.âA professional providing clinical services to the 659 patient under this part. 660 2.âThe licensed professional who initiated the involuntary 661 examination of the patient, if the examination was initiated by 662 professional certificate. 663 3.âAn employee, an administrator, or a board member of the 664 facility providing the examination of the patient. 665 4.âAn employee, an administrator, or a board member of a 666 treatment facility providing treatment for the patient. 667 5.âA person providing any substantial professional services 668 to the patient, including clinical services. 669 6.âA creditor of the patient. 670 7.âA person subject to an injunction for protection against 671 domestic violence under s. 741.30, whether the order of 672 injunction is temporary or final, and for which the patient was 673 the petitioner. 674 8.âA person subject to an injunction for protection against 675 repeat or serious violence, stalking, sexual violence, or dating 676 violence under s. 784.046, whether the order of injunction is 677 temporary or final, and for which the patient was the 678 petitioner. 679 Section 6.âParagraph (h) of subsection (2) of section 680 394.4598, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 681 394.4598âGuardian advocate.â 682 (2)âThe following persons are prohibited from appointment 683 as a patientâs guardian advocate: 684 (h)âA person subject to an injunction for protection 685 against repeat or serious violence, stalking, sexual violence, 686 or dating violence under s. 784.046, whether the order of 687 injunction is temporary or final, and for which the patient was 688 the petitioner. 689 Section 7.âSubsection (3) of section 741.2901, Florida 690 Statutes, is amended to read: 691 741.2901âDomestic violence cases; prosecutors; legislative 692 intent; investigation; duty of circuits; first appearance.â 693 (3)âBefore Prior to a defendantâs first appearance in any 694 charge of domestic violence as defined in s. 741.28, the State 695 Attorneyâs Office shall perform a thorough investigation of the 696 defendantâs history, including, but not limited to: prior 697 arrests for domestic violence, prior arrests for nondomestic 698 charges, prior injunctions for protection against domestic and 699 repeat or serious violence filed listing the defendant as 700 respondent and noting history of other victims, and prior walk 701 in domestic complaints filed against the defendant. This 702 information must shall be presented at first appearance, when 703 setting bond, and when passing sentence, for consideration by 704 the court. When a defendant is arrested for an act of domestic 705 violence, the defendant must shall be held in custody until 706 brought before the court for admittance to bail in accordance 707 with chapter 903. In determining bail, the court shall consider 708 the safety of the victim, the victimâs children, and any other 709 person who may be in danger if the defendant is released. 710 Section 8.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) and paragraph 711 (b) of subsection (8) of section 741.30, Florida Statutes, are 712 amended to read: 713 741.30âDomestic violence; injunction; powers and duties of 714 court and clerk; petition; notice and hearing; temporary 715 injunction; issuance of injunction; statewide verification 716 system; enforcement; public records exemption.â 717 (2) 718 (c)1.âThe clerk of the court shall assist petitioners in 719 seeking both injunctions for protection against domestic 720 violence and enforcement for a violation thereof as specified in 721 this section. 722 2.âAll clerksâ offices shall provide simplified petition 723 forms for the injunction, any modifications, and the enforcement 724 thereof, including instructions for completion. 725 3.âThe clerk of the court shall advise petitioners of the 726 opportunity to apply for a certificate of indigence in lieu of 727 prepayment for the cost of the filing fee, as provided in 728 paragraph (a). 729 4.âThe clerk of the court shall ensure the petitionerâs 730 privacy to the extent practical while completing the forms for 731 injunctions for protection against domestic violence. 732 5.âThe clerk of the court shall provide petitioners with a 733 minimum of two certified copies of the order of injunction, one 734 of which is serviceable and will inform the petitioner of the 735 process for service and enforcement. 736 6.âClerks of court and appropriate staff in each county 737 shall receive training in the effective assistance of 738 petitioners as provided or approved by the Florida Association 739 of Court Clerks. 740 7.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall make 741 available informational brochures on domestic violence when such 742 brochures are provided by local certified domestic violence 743 centers. 744 8.âThe clerk of the court in each county shall distribute a 745 statewide uniform informational brochure to petitioners at the 746 time of filing for an injunction for protection against domestic 747 or repeat or serious violence when such brochures become 748 available. The brochure must include information about the 749 effect of giving the court false information about domestic 750 violence. 751 (8) 752 (b)âA Domestic and Repeat or Serious Violence Injunction 753 Statewide Verification System is created within the Department 754 of Law Enforcement. The department shall establish, implement, 755 and maintain a statewide communication system capable of 756 electronically transmitting information to and between criminal 757 justice agencies relating to domestic violence injunctions and 758 repeat or serious violence injunctions issued by the courts 759 throughout the state. Such information must include, but is not 760 limited to, information as to the existence and status of any 761 injunction for verification purposes. 762 Section 9.âParagraph (b) of subsection (2) of section 763 741.313, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 764 741.313âUnlawful action against employees seeking 765 protection.â 766 (2) 767 (b)âThis section applies if an employee uses the leave from 768 work to: 769 1.âSeek an injunction for protection against domestic 770 violence or an injunction for protection in cases of repeat or 771 serious violence, dating violence, or sexual violence; 772 2.âObtain medical care or mental health counseling, or 773 both, for the employee or a family or household member to 774 address physical or psychological injuries resulting from the 775 act of domestic violence or sexual violence; 776 3.âObtain services from a victim services organization, 777 including, but not limited to, a domestic violence shelter or 778 program or a rape crisis center as a result of the act of 779 domestic violence or sexual violence; 780 4.âMake the employeeâs home secure from the perpetrator of 781 the domestic violence or sexual violence or to seek new housing 782 to escape the perpetrator; or 783 5.âSeek legal assistance in addressing issues arising from 784 the act of domestic violence or sexual violence or to attend and 785 prepare for court-related proceedings arising from the act of 786 domestic violence or sexual violence. 787 Section 10.âSubsection (1) of section 784.047, Florida 788 Statutes, is amended to read: 789 784.047âPenalties for violating protective injunction 790 against violators.â 791 (1)âA person who willfully violates an injunction for 792 protection against repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, 793 or dating violence, issued pursuant to s. 784.046, or a foreign 794 protection order accorded full faith and credit pursuant to s. 795 741.315 by: 796 (a)âRefusing to vacate the dwelling that the parties share; 797 (b)âGoing to, or being within 500 feet of, the petitionerâs 798 residence, school, place of employment, or a specified place 799 frequented regularly by the petitioner and any named family or 800 household member; 801 (c)âCommitting an act of repeat or serious violence, sexual 802 violence, or dating violence against the petitioner; 803 (d)âCommitting any other violation of the injunction 804 through an intentional unlawful threat, word, or act to do 805 violence to the petitioner; 806 (e)âTelephoning, contacting, or otherwise communicating 807 with the petitioner directly or indirectly, unless the 808 injunction specifically allows indirect contact through a third 809 party; 810 (f)âKnowingly and intentionally coming within 100 feet of 811 the petitionerâs motor vehicle, whether or not that vehicle is 812 occupied; 813 (g)âDefacing or destroying the petitionerâs personal 814 property, including the petitionerâs motor vehicle; or 815 (h)âRefusing to surrender firearms or ammunition if ordered 816 to do so by the court, 817 818 commits a misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as 819 provided in s. 775.082 or s. 775.083, except as provided in 820 subsection (2). 821 Section 11.âSubsection (4) of section 784.048, Florida 822 Statutes, is amended to read: 823 784.048âStalking; definitions; penalties.â 824 (4)âA person who, after an injunction for protection 825 against repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, or dating 826 violence pursuant to s. 784.046, or an injunction for protection 827 against domestic violence pursuant to s. 741.30, or after any 828 other court-imposed prohibition of conduct toward the subject 829 person or that personâs property, knowingly, willfully, 830 maliciously, and repeatedly follows, harasses, or cyberstalks 831 another person commits the offense of aggravated stalking, a 832 felony of the third degree, punishable as provided in s. 833 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 834 Section 12.âSubsections (2) and (3) of section 790.06, 835 Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 836 790.06âLicense to carry concealed weapon or concealed 837 firearm.â 838 (2)âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 839 shall issue a license if the applicant: 840 (a)âIs a resident of the United States and a citizen of the 841 United States or a permanent resident alien of the United 842 States, as determined by the United States Bureau of Citizenship 843 and Immigration Services, or is a consular security official of 844 a foreign government that maintains diplomatic relations and 845 treaties of commerce, friendship, and navigation with the United 846 States and is certified as such by the foreign government and by 847 the appropriate embassy in this country; 848 (b)âIs 21 years of age or older; 849 (c)âDoes not suffer from a physical infirmity that which 850 prevents the safe handling of a weapon or firearm; 851 (d)âIs not ineligible to possess a firearm pursuant to s. 852 790.23 by virtue of having been convicted of a felony; 853 (e)âHas not been: 854 1.âFound guilty of a crime under the provisions of chapter 855 893 or similar laws of any other state relating to controlled 856 substances within a 3-year period immediately preceding the date 857 on which the application is submitted; or 858 2.âCommitted for the abuse of a controlled substance under 859 chapter 397 or under the provisions of former chapter 396 or 860 similar laws of any other state. An applicant who has been 861 granted relief from firearms disabilities pursuant to s. 862 790.065(2)(a)4.d. or pursuant to the law of the state in which 863 the commitment occurred is deemed not to be committed for the 864 abuse of a controlled substance under this subparagraph; 865 (f)âDoes not chronically and habitually use alcoholic 866 beverages or other substances to the extent that his or her 867 normal faculties are impaired. It shall be presumed that an 868 applicant chronically and habitually uses alcoholic beverages or 869 other substances to the extent that his or her normal faculties 870 are impaired if the applicant has been convicted under s. 871 790.151 or has been deemed a habitual offender under s. 872 856.011(3), or has had two or more convictions under s. 316.193 873 or similar laws of any other state, within the 3-year period 874 immediately preceding the date on which the application is 875 submitted; 876 (g)âDesires a legal means to carry a concealed weapon or 877 concealed firearm for lawful self-defense; 878 (h)âDemonstrates competence with a firearm by any one of 879 the following: 880 1.âCompletion of any hunter education or hunter safety 881 course approved by the Fish and Wildlife Conservation Commission 882 or a similar agency of another state; 883 2.âCompletion of any National Rifle Association firearms 884 safety or training course; 885 3.âCompletion of any firearms safety or training course or 886 class available to the general public offered by a law 887 enforcement agency, junior college, college, or private or 888 public institution or organization or firearms training school, 889 using instructors certified by the National Rifle Association, 890 Criminal Justice Standards and Training Commission, or the 891 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services; 892 4.âCompletion of any law enforcement firearms safety or 893 training course or class offered for security guards, 894 investigators, special deputies, or any division or subdivision 895 of a law enforcement agency or security enforcement; 896 5.âPresents evidence of equivalent experience with a 897 firearm through participation in organized shooting competition 898 or United States military service; 899 6.âIs licensed or has been licensed to carry a concealed 900 weapon or concealed firearm in this state or a county or 901 municipality of this state, unless such license has been revoked 902 for cause; or 903 7.âCompletion of any firearms training or safety course or 904 class conducted by a state-certified or National Rifle 905 Association certified firearms instructor; 906 907 A photocopy of a certificate of completion of any of the courses 908 or classes; an affidavit from the instructor, school, club, 909 organization, or group that conducted or taught such course or 910 class attesting to the completion of the course or class by the 911 applicant; or a copy of any document that shows completion of 912 the course or class or evidences participation in firearms 913 competition shall constitute evidence of qualification under 914 this paragraph. A person who conducts a course pursuant to 915 subparagraph 2., subparagraph 3., or subparagraph 7., or who, as 916 an instructor, attests to the completion of such courses, must 917 maintain records certifying that he or she observed the student 918 safely handle and discharge the firearm in his or her physical 919 presence and that the discharge of the firearm included live 920 fire using a firearm and ammunition as defined in s. 790.001; 921 (i)âHas not been adjudicated an incapacitated person under 922 s. 744.331, or similar laws of any other state. An applicant who 923 has been granted relief from firearms disabilities pursuant to 924 s. 790.065(2)(a)4.d. or pursuant to the law of the state in 925 which the adjudication occurred is deemed not to have been 926 adjudicated an incapacitated person under this paragraph; 927 (j)âHas not been committed to a mental institution under 928 chapter 394, or similar laws of any other state. An applicant 929 who has been granted relief from firearms disabilities pursuant 930 to s. 790.065(2)(a)4.d. or pursuant to the law of the state in 931 which the commitment occurred is deemed not to have been 932 committed in a mental institution under this paragraph; 933 (k)âHas not had adjudication of guilt withheld or 934 imposition of sentence suspended on any felony unless 3 years 935 have elapsed since probation or any other conditions set by the 936 court have been fulfilled, or expunction has occurred; 937 (l)âHas not had adjudication of guilt withheld or 938 imposition of sentence suspended on any misdemeanor crime of 939 domestic violence unless 3 years have elapsed since probation or 940 any other conditions set by the court have been fulfilled, or 941 the record has been expunged; 942 (m)âHas not been issued an injunction that is currently in 943 force and effect and that restrains the applicant from 944 committing acts of domestic violence or acts of repeat or 945 serious violence; and 946 (n)âIs not prohibited from purchasing or possessing a 947 firearm by any other provision of Florida or federal law. 948 (3)(a)âThe Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services 949 shall deny a license if the applicant has been found guilty of, 950 had adjudication of guilt withheld for, or had imposition of 951 sentence suspended for one or more crimes of violence 952 constituting a misdemeanor, unless 3 years have elapsed since 953 probation or any other conditions set by the court have been 954 fulfilled or the record has been sealed or expunged. The 955 Department of Agriculture and Consumer Services shall revoke a 956 license if the licensee has been found guilty of, had 957 adjudication of guilt withheld for, or had imposition of 958 sentence suspended for one or more crimes of violence within the 959 preceding 3 years. The department must shall, upon notification 960 by a law enforcement agency, a court, a clerkâs office, or the 961 Florida Department of Law Enforcement, temporarily suspend a 962 license or the processing of an application for a license if the 963 licensee or applicant is arrested or formally charged with a 964 crime that would disqualify such person from having a license 965 under this section, until final disposition of the case. The 966 department must shall suspend a license or the processing of an 967 application for a license if the licensee or applicant is issued 968 an injunction that restrains the licensee or applicant from 969 committing acts of domestic violence or acts of repeat or 970 serious violence. The department shall notify the licensee or 971 applicant suspended under this section of his or her right to a 972 hearing pursuant to chapter 120. If the criminal case or 973 injunction results in a nondisqualifying disposition and the 974 applicant or licensee is otherwise eligible, the suspension must 975 shall end. The department must issue an order confirming the end 976 of the suspension within 90 days after the applicantâs or 977 licenseeâs submission to the department of a copy of the final 978 resolution of the criminal case or injunction. The copy provided 979 to the department must be sent through electronic or certified 980 mail to a location that must shall be specified on the notice of 981 suspension received by the licensee or applicant. If the 982 criminal case or injunction results in a disqualifying 983 disposition, the suspension must remain in effect and the 984 department must proceed with denial or revocation proceedings 985 pursuant to chapter 120. 986 (b)âThis subsection may not be construed to limit, 987 restrict, or inhibit the constitutional right to bear arms and 988 carry a concealed weapon in this state. The Legislature finds it 989 a matter of public policy and public safety that it is necessary 990 to ensure that potentially disqualifying information about an 991 applicant or licensee is investigated and processed in a timely 992 manner by the department pursuant to this section. The 993 Legislature intends to clarify that suspensions pursuant to this 994 section are temporary, and the department has the duty to make 995 an eligibility determination and issue a license in the 996 timeframe prescribed in this subsection. 997 Section 13.âParagraph (c) of subsection (2) of section 998 790.065, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 999 790.065âSale and delivery of firearms.â 1000 (2)âUpon receipt of a request for a criminal history record 1001 check, the Department of Law Enforcement shall, during the 1002 licenseeâs call or by return call, forthwith: 1003 (c)1.âReview any records available to it to determine 1004 whether the potential buyer or transferee has been indicted or 1005 has had an information filed against her or him for an offense 1006 that is a felony under either state or federal law, or, as 1007 mandated by federal law, has had an injunction for protection 1008 against domestic violence entered against the potential buyer or 1009 transferee under s. 741.30, has had an injunction for protection 1010 against repeat or serious violence entered against the potential 1011 buyer or transferee under s. 784.046, or has been arrested for a 1012 dangerous crime as specified in s. 907.041(5)(a) or for any of 1013 the following enumerated offenses: 1014 a.âCriminal anarchy under ss. 876.01 and 876.02. 1015 b.âExtortion under s. 836.05. 1016 c.âExplosives violations under s. 552.22(1) and (2). 1017 d.âControlled substances violations under chapter 893. 1018 e.âResisting an officer with violence under s. 843.01. 1019 f.âWeapons and firearms violations under this chapter. 1020 g.âTreason under s. 876.32. 1021 h.âAssisting self-murder under s. 782.08. 1022 i.âSabotage under s. 876.38. 1023 j.âStalking or aggravated stalking under s. 784.048. 1024 1025 If the review indicates any such indictment, information, or 1026 arrest, the department must shall provide to the licensee a 1027 conditional nonapproval number. 1028 2.âWithin 24 working hours, the department shall determine 1029 the disposition of the indictment, information, or arrest and 1030 inform the licensee as to whether the potential buyer is 1031 prohibited from receiving or possessing a firearm. For purposes 1032 of this paragraph, âworking hoursâ means the hours from 8 a.m. 1033 to 5 p.m. Monday through Friday, excluding legal holidays. 1034 3.âThe office of the clerk of court, at no charge to the 1035 department, shall respond to any department request for data on 1036 the disposition of the indictment, information, or arrest as 1037 soon as possible, but in no event later than 8 working hours. 1038 4.âThe department shall determine as quickly as possible 1039 within the allotted time period whether the potential buyer is 1040 prohibited from receiving or possessing a firearm. 1041 5.âIf the potential buyer is not so prohibited, or if the 1042 department cannot determine the disposition information within 1043 the allotted time period, the department must shall provide the 1044 licensee with a conditional approval number. 1045 6.âIf the buyer is so prohibited, the conditional 1046 nonapproval number must shall become a nonapproval number. 1047 7.âThe department shall continue its attempts to obtain the 1048 disposition information and may retain a record of all approval 1049 numbers granted without sufficient disposition information. If 1050 the department later obtains disposition information which 1051 indicates: 1052 a.âThat the potential buyer is not prohibited from owning a 1053 firearm, it must shall treat the record of the transaction in 1054 accordance with this section; or 1055 b.âThat the potential buyer is prohibited from owning a 1056 firearm, it must shall immediately revoke the conditional 1057 approval number and notify local law enforcement. 1058 8.âDuring the time that disposition of the indictment, 1059 information, or arrest is pending and until the department is 1060 notified by the potential buyer that there has been a final 1061 disposition of the indictment, information, or arrest, the 1062 conditional nonapproval number must shall remain in effect. 1063 Section 14.âParagraph (m) of subsection (2) of section 1064 934.03, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1065 934.03âInterception and disclosure of wire, oral, or 1066 electronic communications prohibited.â 1067 (2) 1068 (m)âIt is lawful under this section and ss. 934.04-934.09 1069 for a person who is protected under an active temporary or final 1070 injunction for repeat or serious violence, sexual violence, or 1071 dating violence under s. 784.046; stalking under s. 784.0485; 1072 domestic violence under s. 741.30; or any other court-imposed 1073 prohibition of conduct toward the person to intercept and record 1074 a wire, oral, or electronic communication received in violation 1075 of such injunction or court order. A recording authorized under 1076 this paragraph may be provided to a law enforcement agency, an 1077 attorney, or a court for the purpose of evidencing a violation 1078 of an injunction or court order if the subject of the injunction 1079 or court order prohibiting contact has been served the 1080 injunction or is on notice that the conduct is prohibited. A 1081 recording authorized under this paragraph may not be otherwise 1082 disseminated or shared. 1083 Section 15.âParagraph (e) of subsection (2) of section 1084 943.05, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 1085 943.05âCriminal Justice Information Program; duties; crime 1086 reports.â 1087 (2)âThe program shall: 1088 (e)âEstablish, implement, and maintain a Domestic and 1089 Repeat or Serious Violence Injunction Statewide Verification 1090 System capable of electronically transmitting information to and 1091 between criminal justice agencies relating to domestic violence 1092 injunctions, injunctions to prevent child abuse issued under 1093 chapter 39, and repeat or serious violence injunctions issued by 1094 the courts throughout the state. Such information must include, 1095 but is not limited to, information as to the existence and 1096 status of any such injunction for verification purposes. 1097 Section 16.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1098 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in 1099 references thereto, paragraphs (a), (c), and (d) of subsection 1100 (8) of section 28.2221, Florida Statutes, are reenacted to read: 1101 28.2221âElectronic access to official records.â 1102 (8)(a)âEach county recorder or clerk of the court must make 1103 the identity of each respondent against whom a final judgment 1104 for an injunction for the protection of a minor under s. 741.30, 1105 s. 784.046, or s. 784.0485 is entered, as well as the fact that 1106 a final judgment for an injunction for the protection of a minor 1107 under s. 741.30, s. 784.046, or s. 784.0485 has been entered 1108 against that respondent, publicly available on the county 1109 recorderâs or clerk of the courtâs official website, unless the 1110 respondent is a minor. The identity and information required 1111 under this subsection must be viewable through a searchable 1112 database that is available in a clear and conspicuous location 1113 on the homepage of the county recorderâs or clerk of the courtâs 1114 official website and must be available for search by the general 1115 public. 1116 (c)âAny information specified in this subsection not made 1117 available by the county clerk of the court as provided in this 1118 subsection before July 1, 2024, must be made publicly available 1119 on the county recorderâs or clerk of the courtâs official 1120 website if the affected party identifies the information and 1121 requests that such information be added for general public 1122 display. Such request must be in writing and delivered by mail, 1123 facsimile, or electronic transmission or in person to the county 1124 recorder or clerk of the court. The request must specify the 1125 case number assigned to the final judgment for an injunction for 1126 the protection of a minor under s. 741.30, s. 784.046, or s. 1127 784.0485. A fee may not be charged for the addition of 1128 information pursuant to such request. 1129 (d)âNo later than 30 days after July 1, 2024, notice of the 1130 right of any affected party to request the addition of 1131 information to the searchable database on the county recorderâs 1132 or clerk of the courtâs official website pursuant to this 1133 subsection must be conspicuously and clearly displayed by the 1134 county recorder or clerk of the court on the county recorderâs 1135 or clerk of the courtâs official website on which images or 1136 copies of the countyâs public records are placed and in the 1137 office of each county recorder or clerk of the court. Such 1138 notice must contain appropriate instructions for making the 1139 addition of information request in person, by mail, by 1140 facsimile, or by electronic transmission. The notice must state, 1141 in substantially similar form, that any person has a right to 1142 request that a county recorder or clerk of the court add 1143 information to the searchable database on the county recorderâs 1144 or clerk of the courtâs official website if that information 1145 involves the identity of a respondent against whom a final 1146 judgment for an injunction for the protection of a minor under 1147 s. 741.30, s. 784.046, or s. 784.0485 is entered, unless the 1148 respondent is a minor. The notice must also state that the 1149 information related to the identity of each respondent against 1150 whom a final judgment for an injunction for the protection of a 1151 minor under s. 741.30, s. 784.046, or s. 784.0485 is entered is 1152 available for search by the general public. The notice must 1153 include step-by-step instructions detailing how a user can 1154 access the searchable database and search for such information. 1155 Such request must be made in writing and delivered by mail, 1156 facsimile, or electronic transmission or in person to the county 1157 recorder or clerk of the court. The request must specify the 1158 case number assigned to the final judgment for an injunction for 1159 the protection of a minor under s. 741.30, s. 784.046, or s. 1160 784.0485. A fee may not be charged for the addition of a 1161 document pursuant to such request. 1162 Section 17.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1163 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1164 reference thereto, subsection (1) of section 61.1827, Florida 1165 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1166 61.1827âIdentifying information concerning applicants for 1167 and recipients of child support services.â 1168 (1)âAny information that reveals the identity of applicants 1169 for or recipients of child support services, including the name, 1170 address, and telephone number of such persons, held by a non 1171 Title IV-D county child support enforcement agency is 1172 confidential and exempt from s. 119.07(1) and s. 24(a), Art. I 1173 of the State Constitution. The use or disclosure of such 1174 information by the non-Title IV-D county child support 1175 enforcement agency is limited to the purposes directly connected 1176 with: 1177 (a)âAny investigation, prosecution, or criminal or civil 1178 proceeding connected with the administration of any non-Title 1179 IV-D county child support enforcement program; 1180 (b)âMandatory disclosure of identifying and location 1181 information as provided in s. 61.13(7) by the non-Title IV-D 1182 county child support enforcement agency when providing non-Title 1183 IV-D services; 1184 (c)âMandatory disclosure of information as required by ss. 1185 409.2577, 61.181, 61.1825, and 61.1826 and Title IV-D of the 1186 Social Security Act; or 1187 (d)âDisclosure to an authorized person, as defined in 45 1188 C.F.R. s. 303.15, for purposes of enforcing any state or federal 1189 law with respect to the unlawful taking or restraint of a child 1190 or making or enforcing a parenting plan. As used in this 1191 paragraph, the term âauthorized personâ includes a parent with 1192 whom the child does not currently reside, unless a court has 1193 entered an order under s. 741.30, s. 741.31, or s. 784.046. 1194 Section 18.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1195 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1196 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 741.311, Florida 1197 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1198 741.311âHope Card Program for persons issued orders of 1199 protection.â 1200 (2)âBeginning October 1, 2024, a person who has been issued 1201 a final judgment on injunction for protection under s. 741.30, 1202 s. 784.046, s. 784.0485, or s. 825.1035 may request a Hope Card 1203 from the clerk of the court of the circuit in which the order 1204 for an injunction for protection was entered. A person may 1205 request a Hope Card at the time the final judgment on injunction 1206 for protection is issued or at any other time before the 1207 expiration of the order for protection. 1208 Section 19.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1209 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1210 reference thereto, subsection (2) of section 741.315, Florida 1211 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1212 741.315âRecognition of foreign protection orders.â 1213 (2)âPursuant to 18 U.S.C. s. 2265, an injunction for 1214 protection against domestic violence issued by a court of a 1215 foreign state must be accorded full faith and credit by the 1216 courts of this state and enforced by a law enforcement agency as 1217 if it were the order of a Florida court issued under s. 741.30, 1218 s. 741.31, s. 784.046, s. 784.047, s. 784.0485, or s. 784.0487, 1219 and provided that the court had jurisdiction over the parties 1220 and the matter and that reasonable notice and opportunity to be 1221 heard was given to the person against whom the order is sought 1222 sufficient to protect that personâs right to due process. Ex 1223 parte foreign injunctions for protection are not eligible for 1224 enforcement under this section unless notice and opportunity to 1225 be heard have been provided within the time required by the 1226 foreign state or tribal law, and in any event within a 1227 reasonable time after the order is issued, sufficient to protect 1228 the respondentâs due process rights. 1229 Section 20.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1230 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in 1231 references thereto, paragraph (e) of subsection (2) and 1232 paragraph (c) of subsection (3) of section 790.401, Florida 1233 Statutes, are reenacted to read: 1234 790.401âRisk protection orders.â 1235 (2)âPETITION FOR A RISK PROTECTION ORDER.âThere is created 1236 an action known as a petition for a risk protection order. 1237 (e)âA petition must: 1238 1.âAllege that the respondent poses a significant danger of 1239 causing personal injury to himself or herself or others by 1240 having a firearm or any ammunition in his or her custody or 1241 control or by purchasing, possessing, or receiving a firearm or 1242 any ammunition, and must be accompanied by an affidavit made 1243 under oath stating the specific statements, actions, or facts 1244 that give rise to a reasonable fear of significant dangerous 1245 acts by the respondent; 1246 2.âIdentify the quantities, types, and locations of all 1247 firearms and ammunition the petitioner believes to be in the 1248 respondentâs current ownership, possession, custody, or control; 1249 and 1250 3.âIdentify whether there is a known existing protection 1251 order governing the respondent under s. 741.30, s. 784.046, or 1252 s. 784.0485 or under any other applicable statute. 1253 (3)âRISK PROTECTION ORDER HEARINGS AND ISSUANCE.â 1254 (c)âIn determining whether grounds for a risk protection 1255 order exist, the court may consider any relevant evidence, 1256 including, but not limited to, any of the following: 1257 1.âA recent act or threat of violence by the respondent 1258 against himself or herself or others, whether or not such 1259 violence or threat of violence involves a firearm. 1260 2.âAn act or threat of violence by the respondent within 1261 the past 12 months, including, but not limited to, acts or 1262 threats of violence by the respondent against himself or herself 1263 or others. 1264 3.âEvidence of the respondent being seriously mentally ill 1265 or having recurring mental health issues. 1266 4.âA violation by the respondent of a risk protection order 1267 or a no contact order issued under s. 741.30, s. 784.046, or s. 1268 784.0485. 1269 5.âA previous or existing risk protection order issued 1270 against the respondent. 1271 6.âA violation of a previous or existing risk protection 1272 order issued against the respondent. 1273 7.âWhether the respondent, in this state or any other 1274 state, has been convicted of, had adjudication withheld on, or 1275 pled nolo contendere to a crime that constitutes domestic 1276 violence as defined in s. 741.28. 1277 8.âWhether the respondent has used, or has threatened to 1278 use, against himself or herself or others any weapons. 1279 9.âThe unlawful or reckless use, display, or brandishing of 1280 a firearm by the respondent. 1281 10.âThe recurring use of, or threat to use, physical force 1282 by the respondent against another person or the respondent 1283 stalking another person. 1284 11.âWhether the respondent, in this state or any other 1285 state, has been arrested for, convicted of, had adjudication 1286 withheld on, or pled nolo contendere to a crime involving 1287 violence or a threat of violence. 1288 12.âCorroborated evidence of the abuse of controlled 1289 substances or alcohol by the respondent. 1290 13.âEvidence of recent acquisition of firearms or 1291 ammunition by the respondent. 1292 14.âAny relevant information from family and household 1293 members concerning the respondent. 1294 15.âWitness testimony, taken while the witness is under 1295 oath, relating to the matter before the court. 1296 Section 21.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1297 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1298 reference thereto, subsection (6) of section 901.15, Florida 1299 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1300 901.15âWhen arrest by officer without warrant is lawful.âA 1301 law enforcement officer may arrest a person without a warrant 1302 when: 1303 (6)âThere is probable cause to believe that the person has 1304 committed a criminal act according to s. 790.233 or according to 1305 s. 741.31, s. 784.047, or s. 825.1036 which violates an 1306 injunction for protection entered pursuant to s. 741.30, s. 1307 784.046, or s. 825.1035 or a foreign protection order accorded 1308 full faith and credit pursuant to s. 741.315, over the objection 1309 of the petitioner, if necessary. 1310 Section 22.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1311 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1312 reference thereto, subsection (5) of section 901.41, Florida 1313 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1314 901.41âPrearrest diversion programs.â 1315 (5)âELIGIBILITY.âA violent misdemeanor, a misdemeanor crime 1316 of domestic violence, as defined in s. 741.28, or a misdemeanor 1317 under s. 741.29, s. 741.31, s. 784.046, s. 784.047, s. 784.048, 1318 s. 784.0487, or s. 784.049 does not qualify for a civil citation 1319 or prearrest diversion program. 1320 Section 23.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1321 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1322 reference thereto, paragraph (p) of subsection (6) of section 1323 921.141, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1324 921.141âSentence of death or life imprisonment for capital 1325 felonies; further proceedings to determine sentence.â 1326 (6)âAGGRAVATING FACTORS.âAggravating factors shall be 1327 limited to the following: 1328 (p)âThe capital felony was committed by a person subject to 1329 an injunction issued pursuant to s. 741.30 or s. 784.046, or a 1330 foreign protection order accorded full faith and credit pursuant 1331 to s. 741.315, and was committed against the petitioner who 1332 obtained the injunction or protection order or any spouse, 1333 child, sibling, or parent of the petitioner. 1334 Section 24.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1335 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1336 reference thereto, paragraph (j) of subsection (7) of section 1337 921.1425, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1338 921.1425âSentence of death or life imprisonment for capital 1339 sexual battery; further proceedings to determine sentence.â 1340 (7)âAGGRAVATING FACTORS.âAggravating factors shall be 1341 limited to the following: 1342 (j)âThe capital felony was committed by a person subject to 1343 an injunction issued pursuant to s. 741.30 or s. 784.046, or a 1344 foreign protection order accorded full faith and credit pursuant 1345 to s. 741.315, and was committed against the petitioner who 1346 obtained the injunction or protection order or any spouse, 1347 child, sibling, or parent of the petitioner. 1348 Section 25.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1349 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1350 reference thereto, paragraph (i) of subsection (7) of section 1351 921.1427, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1352 921.1427âSentence of death or life imprisonment for capital 1353 human trafficking of vulnerable persons for sexual exploitation; 1354 further proceedings to determine sentence.â 1355 (7)âAGGRAVATING FACTORS.âAggravating factors shall be 1356 limited to the following: 1357 (i)âThe capital felony was committed by a person subject to 1358 an injunction issued pursuant to s. 741.30 or s. 784.046, or a 1359 foreign protection order accorded full faith and credit pursuant 1360 to s. 741.315, and was committed against the petitioner who 1361 obtained the injunction or protection order or any spouse, 1362 child, sibling, or parent of the petitioner. 1363 Section 26.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 1364 made by this act to section 784.046, Florida Statutes, in a 1365 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 934.425, Florida 1366 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 1367 934.425âInstallation or use of tracking devices or tracking 1368 applications; exceptions; penalties.â 1369 (3)âFor purposes of this section, a personâs consent is 1370 presumed to be revoked if: 1371 (a)âThe consenting person and the person to whom consent 1372 was given are lawfully married and one person files a petition 1373 for dissolution of marriage from the other; or 1374 (b)âThe consenting person or the person to whom consent was 1375 given files an injunction for protection against the other 1376 person pursuant to s. 741.30, s. 741.315, s. 784.046, or s. 1377 784.0485. 1378 Section 27.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.